Massachusetts, session 194th, H3502.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The department of public utilities shall, in consultation with the distribution companies,
conduct a process to investigate establishing and refining standards that expand the use of
distributed grid edge software on advanced meter infrastructure meters already approved by the
department, which supports efficiency, load flexibility and distribution system intelligence to
improve system utilization, reduce costs and improve reliability to customers. Standards shall
include, but shall not be limited to, methods for increasing capacity for managing loads and
resources in the grid by electric utilities and third parties. The distribution companies shall
design at least 1 metric for improved monitoring and controlling the grid using high-resolution
data in utility meters that will allow such distribution companies to earn an incentive for positive
performance. The department of public utilities shall complete its investigation and submit a
report detailing its conclusions to the joint committee on telecommunications, utilities and
energy not later than December 31, 2025.
of 1